Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5456.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-64-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-64 entitled "Rhode Island
Commerce Corporation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-64-8. Directors, officers, and employees.
(a) The powers of the Rhode Island commerce corporation shall be vested in a board of
directors consisting of thirteen (13) members.
(1) The governor shall serve as a member of the board and as chairperson, ex-officio, who
shall vote only in the event of a tie.
(2) In addition to the governor, the membership of the board shall consist of twelve (12)
public members to be appointed by the governor.
(3) Each gubernatorial appointee shall be subject to the advice and consent of the senate
and no one shall be eligible for appointment unless he or she is a resident of this state. The
membership of the board shall reflect the geographic diversity of the state. Four (4) of the public
members shall be owners or principals of small businesses doing business in this state which are
independently owned and operated and which employs one hundred (100) or fewer persons. One
other of the public members shall be a representative of organized labor. One other of the public
members shall be a representative of higher education. One other of the public members shall be a
representative from the governor’s workforce board. One other of the public members shall be a
representative of a minority business. One other of the public members shall be appointed on an

interim basis by the governor when a project plan of the corporation situated on federal land is
disapproved by the governing body of a municipality in accordance with § 42-64-13(a)(4). The
member shall be the mayor of the municipality within whose borders all or a majority of the project
plan is to be carried out, or in a municipality that has no mayor, the member shall be the president
of the town or city council. The appointed interim member shall have all the powers of other
members of the board only in its deliberations and action on the disapproval of the project plan
situated on federal land and within the borders of the interim member's municipality. Upon final
action by the board pursuant to § 42-64-13(a)(5), the interim member’s term of appointment shall
automatically terminate.
(4) It shall be the responsibility of the corporation to conduct a training course for newly
appointed and qualified members and new designees of ex-officio members within six (6) months
of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the executive director of the
corporation or the executive director's designee, be approved by the board, and conducted by the
executive director or the executive director's designee. The board may approve the use of any board
or staff members or other individuals to assist with training. The training course shall include
instruction in the following areas: the provisions of the entirety of chapter 64 of this title and of
chapter 46 of this title, chapter 14 of title 36, and chapter 2 of title 38 of the Rhode Island general
laws; and the board’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall,
within ninety (90) days of July 15, 2005, prepare and disseminate materials relating to the
provisions of chapter 46 of this title, chapter 14 of title 36, and chapter 2 of title 38.
(5) Members of the board shall be removable by the governor, pursuant to the provisions
of § 36-1-7 and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to
capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.
(6) The terms for the members of the board of directors were established by the
appointment of twelve (12) directors in 2010 with the directors’ initial terms expiring as follows:
three (3) members shall have terms expiring on February 1, 2011; three (3) members shall have
terms expiring on February 1, 2012; three (3) members shall have terms expiring on February 1,
2013; and three (3) members shall have terms expiring on February 1, 2014. Beginning in 2011
and annually thereafter, during the month of January, the governor shall appoint a member or
members to succeed the member or members whose terms will then next expire to serve for a term
of four (4) years commencing on the first day of February and then next following, and thereafter
until the successors are appointed and qualified. Beginning in 2011 and annually thereafter, the
governor shall appoint owners or principals of small businesses doing business in this state that are
independently owned and operated, and that employ one hundred (100) or fewer persons. The
LC000924 - Page 2 of 6

members of the board shall be eligible to succeed themselves, but only upon reappointment and
with senate advice and consent.
(7) In the event of a vacancy occurring in the office of a member by death, resignation, or
otherwise, that vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as an original appointment, but only for
the remainder of the term of the former member.
(b) The directors shall receive no compensation for the performance of their duties under
this chapter, but each director shall be reimbursed for the director's reasonable expenses incurred
in carrying out those duties. A director may engage in private employment, or in a profession or
business.
(c) The chairperson shall designate a vice chairperson from among the members of the
board who shall serve at the pleasure of the chairperson. A majority of directors holding office shall
constitute a quorum, and, except as otherwise provided in § 42-64-13, any action to be taken by the
corporation under the provisions of this chapter may be authorized by resolution approved by a
two-thirds (2/3) majority of the directors present and entitled to vote at any regular or special
meeting at which a quorum is present. A vacancy in the membership of the board of directors shall
not impair the right of a quorum to exercise all of the rights and perform all of the duties of the
corporation.
(d) The chief executive officer of the corporation shall be executive director of the
corporation until such time that the secretary of commerce is appointed. Upon the appointment of
a secretary of commerce, the secretary of commerce shall be the commerce corporation’s chief
executive officer and responsible for the management of the corporation. There shall be a chief
operating officer (COO) of the corporation and he/she shall be appointed by the secretary of
commerce. The COO shall be the chief administrative officer of the corporation and responsible
for the day-to-day management of the corporation. The COO shall be a professional in the area of
economic development; management of economic development corporations; and shall hold the
requisite experience and education as established by the secretary and board.
(e) The board of directors shall appoint a secretary and such additional officers and staff
members as they shall deem appropriate and shall determine the amount of reasonable
compensation, if any, each shall receive. The board of directors may vest in the executive director,
or the director’s subordinates, and, upon the appointment of a secretary of commerce, the chief
operating officer or the chief operating officer’s subordinates, the authority to appoint additional
staff members and to determine the amount of compensation each individual shall receive.
(f) No full-time employee shall, during the period of the employee's employment by the
corporation, engage in any other private employment, profession, or business, except with the
LC000924 - Page 3 of 6

approval of the board of directors.
(g) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, it shall not be or constitute a conflict of
interest for a director, officer, or employee of any financial institution, investment banking firm,
brokerage firm, commercial bank, trust company, building-loan association, architecture firm,
insurance company, or any other firm, person, or corporation to serve as a director of the
corporation, nor shall any contract or transaction between the corporation and a financial institution,
investment banking firm, brokerage firm, commercial bank, trust company, building-loan
association, architecture firm, insurance company, or other firm, person, or corporation be void or
voidable by reason of that service as director of the corporation. If any director, officer, or employee
of the corporation shall be interested either directly or indirectly, or shall be a director, officer, or
employee of or have an ownership interest (other than as the owner of less than one percent (1%)
of the shares of a publicly-held corporation) in any firm or corporation interested directly or
indirectly in any contract with the corporation, that interest shall be disclosed to the corporation
and set forth in the minutes of the corporation, and the director, officer, or employee having that
ownership interest shall not participate on behalf of the corporation in the authorization of that
contract. Interested directors may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting
of the board of directors of the corporation that authorizes the contract or transaction.
(h) Any action taken by the corporation under the provisions of this chapter may be
authorized by vote at any regular or special meeting and each vote shall take effect immediately.
The corporation shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 46 of this title (“Open Meetings”) and
chapter 2 of title 38 (“Access to Public Records”).
(i) The board of directors may designate from among its members an executive committee
and one or more other committees each of which, to the extent authorized by the board of directors,
shall have and may exercise all of the authority of the board of directors, but no executive
committee shall have the authority of the board of directors in reference to the disposition of all or
substantially all of the property and assets of the corporation, amending the bylaws of the
corporation; exercising the condemnation power conferred upon the corporation by § 42-64-9; or
taking actions described or referred to in § 42-64-13(a).
(j) The board shall create a capital finance subcommittee that shall be responsible for
drafting for board approval a set of guidelines, principals, and processes for all loans, loan
guarantees, and financing programs. The guidelines shall contain a set of metrics that the board can
use to determine the effectiveness of each program and to inform the governor and the general
assembly of the outcome of the various programs and to determine if there is need for modification,
continuance, or termination. The guidelines shall also contain measures to annually review the
LC000924 - Page 4 of 6

outstanding loan and loan guarantee programs to determine if the loans and loan guarantees were
granted in accordance with the board’s guidelines and principals and to determine the risk factors
normally used by lending institutions to determine risk and potential for repayment. The board shall
also implement the provisions of §§ 42-64-36 and 42-64-37.
(k) Any action required by this chapter to be taken at a meeting of the board of directors,
or any action that may be taken at a meeting of the board of directors, or committee of the board of
directors, may be taken without a meeting if a consent in writing, setting forth the action to be
taken, shall be signed before or after that action by all of the directors, or all of the members of the
committee, as the case may be.
(l) Employees of the corporation shall not, by reason of their employment, be deemed to
be employees of the state for any purpose, any other provision of the general laws to the contrary
notwithstanding, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, chapters 29, 39, and
42 of title 28 and chapters 4, 8, 9, and 10 of title 36.
(m) The board shall create a set of metrics and reporting requirements to disclose the
programs and services offered or provided by the corporation and the effectiveness of each offering.
The board shall develop an annual report containing these metrics and shall submit the report to the
governor and the general assembly. The annual report shall also contain recommendations for
improving the business climate within the state and other actions the board deems necessary to
improve its effectiveness.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000924
========
LC000924 - Page 5 of 6